North Carolina statutes. Chapter 46. Partition.
Article 1. Partition of Real Property. [Repealed]

§ 46-1.

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-1

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(a), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-2.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-20

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(b), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-2.1.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-2

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(c), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-3.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-21

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(d), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-3.1.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-28

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(e), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-4.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-24

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(f), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-5.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-23

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(g), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-6.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-22

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(h), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-7.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 46A-50(a) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(i), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-7.1.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 46A-50(b) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(j), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-8.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 46A-50(c) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(k), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

Cross References.

As to form of oath, see

G.S. 11-11

.

§ 46-9.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 46A-50(d) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(
l
), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-10.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 46A-51(a) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(m), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-11.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 46A-51(b) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(n), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-12.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 46A-51(c) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(o), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-13.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-52

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(p), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-14.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-25

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(q), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-15.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1959, c. 879, s. 14.

Cross References.

As to intestate succession, see

G.S. 29-1

et seq.

As to abolition of dower and curtesy, see

G.S. 29-4

.

§ 46-16.

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-26

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(r), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-17.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 46A-55(a) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(s), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-17.1.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-54

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(t), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-18.
[Repealed]

Recodified as G.S. 46A-55(b) by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(u), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-19.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-56

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(v), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-20.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-57

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(w), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.

§ 46-21.
[Repealed]

Recodified as

G.S. 46A-58

by Session Laws 2020-23, s. 2(x), effective October 1, 2020, and applicable to partition proceedings commenced on or after that date.